Virginia statutes. Title 63.2. Welfare (Social Services).
Article 5. Oversight and Evaluation of Program.

§ 63.2-1527.
Board oversight duties; Out-of-Family Investigations Advisory Committee.

The Board shall be responsible for establishing standards for out-of-family investigations and for the implementation of the family assessment track of the differential response system.

The Out-of-Family Investigations Advisory Committee (the Committee) is hereby established as an advisory committee in the executive branch of state government.

The Committee shall consist of 15 members as follows: one representative of public school employees, one representative of a hospital for children, one representative of a licensed child care center, one representative of a juvenile detention home, one representative of a public or private residential facility for children, one representative of a family day care home, one representative of a local department of Social Services, one representative of a religious organization with a program for children, one representative of Virginians for Child Abuse Prevention and six citizens of the Commonwealth at large. The Chairman of the Board shall appoint such persons for terms established by the Board.

The Committee shall advise the Board on the effectiveness of the policies and standards governing out-of-family investigations.

The Committee shall elect a chairman and vice-chairman from among its membership. A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum. The meetings of the Committee shall be held at the call of the chairman or whenever the majority of the voting members so request.

Members shall receive no compensation for their services nor be reimbursed for expenses incurred in the discharge of their duties as provided in §§

2.2-2813

and

2.2-2825

.

The Department of Social Services shall provide staff support to the Committee. All agencies of the Commonwealth shall provide assistance to the Committee, upon request.

History.

1993, c. 955, § 63.1-248.7:1; 2000, c. 500; 2002, c. 747; 2004, c. 103.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 103 rewrote the section.

Law Review.

For 2003/2004 survey of family and juvenile law, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 241 (2004).

§ 63.2-1528.
Repealed by Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 73.

Editor’s note.

Former §

63.2-1528

, pertaining to continuation of the Advisory Committee on Child Abuse and Neglect as Advisory Board on Child Abuse and Neglect, derived from 1975, c. 341, § 63.1-248.16; 1979, c. 700; 1980, c. 319; 1985, c. 448; 1989, c. 733; 1990, c. 358; 1991, c. 563; 2002, c. 747; 2004, c. 69; 2009, cc. 813, 840.

§ 63.2-1529.
Repealed by Acts 2009, c. 32.